apertium-kan.kan.lexc
LEXICON ಇವ/__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<prox%>:ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<prox%>:ನ್ನನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<prox%>:ನನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<prox%>:ನ್ನ oo__inc_clit ;!
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>%<prox%>:ನಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<prox%>:ನ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<prox%>:ನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<ins%>%<prox%>:ನಿಂದ # ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<prox%>:ಳು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<prox%>:ಳನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>%<prox%>:ಳಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<prox%>:ಳ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<prox%>:ಳಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<ins%>%<prox%>:ಳಿಂದ # ;

%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<p3%>%<prox%>:ರ ondige  ;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<p3%>%<prox%>:ರು #;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<emph%>:ರೇ #;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<p3%>%<prox%>:ರುಗಳು #;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<p3%>%<prox%>:ರ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<acc%>%<p3%>%<prox%>:ರನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<dat%>%<p3%>%<prox%>:ರಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%<p3%>%<prox%>:ರ # ;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<loc%>%<p3%>%<prox%>:ರಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<ins%>%<p3%>%<prox%>:ರಿಂದ # ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<prox%>:allade ;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<p3%>%<prox%>+ಎಲ್ಲ%<adj%>:ರೆಲ್ಲರ oo__inc_clit;
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<p3%>%<prox%>+ಎರಡು%<num%>:ರಿಬ್ಬರ oo__inc_clit;!ibbaru
%<prn%>%<mf%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%<p3%>%<prox%>+ಎರಡು%<num%>:ರಿಬ್ಬರ #;!ibbaru



LEXICON ಆತ/__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<nom%>:ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<acc%>:ನನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<dat%>:ನಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<gen%>:ನ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<loc%>:ನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<hon%>%<ins%>:ನಿಂದ # ;

LEXICON ಈತ/__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ನಿಂದ # ;

LEXICON ಈಕೆ/__prn
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಯು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ಯುನ್ನನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ಯಿಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ಯ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ಯಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<prox%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ಯಿಂದ # ;





LEXICON ತಾ/__prn
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಾನು # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ಾನ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ಾನೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ಾನೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ನ್ನನ್ನು # ;!ತನ್ನನ್ನು! 
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ನ್ನ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%+ಎಲ್ಲ%<adj%>:ನ್ನೆಲ್ಲಾ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%+ಎಲ್ಲ%<adj%>:ನ್ನೆಲ್ಲ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<emph%>:ನ್ನದೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ನ್ನಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ನಿಂದ # ;

%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ಾವ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ಾವೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ಾವಾಗಿಯೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ಮ್ಮನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ಮಗೆ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಮ್ಮ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಂತಮ್ಮ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<gen%>%<emph%>:ಮ್ಮದೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ಮ್ಮಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ಮ್ಮಿಂದ # ;

%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ನಗ oo__inc_clit;

%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%+ಒಬ್ಬ%<prn%>:ಾನೊಬ್ಬ # ;
%<prn%>%<refl%>%<mfn%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ಮ್ಮ ondige ;

LEXICON ಅದು/__prn 
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವು # ;!
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವರ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವರುಗಳು #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%+also%<adv%>:ವೂಗಳು #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವುಗಳು #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ವುಗಳನ್ನು #;!
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ವುಗಳಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:ವುಗಳಲ್ಲಿಯ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ವನ್ನು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ವಕ್ಕೆ # ;!
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:ವುಗಳಿಂದ # ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದು # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ದೇನೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<emph%>:ದೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ದನ್ನು # ;!ದನ್ನು
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<emph%>:ದನ್ನೇ # ;!ದನ್ನು
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ವುಗಳಿಗೆ #;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ದಕ್ಕೆ # ;!
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ದಕ್ಕ oo__inc_clit ;!ಅದಕ್ಕೂ
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ದಕ್ಕಾಗಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ದರ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>%<emph%>:ದರದೇ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ವುಗಳ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದರಲ್ಲಿ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದರಲ್ಲ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದರಲ್ಲಿಯ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>%<gen%>:ದರಲ್ಲಿನ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದರಿಂದ # ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:ದರಿಂದಾಗಿ # ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದ kinta ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದಾದ # ;!?
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದ ondu ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದ oo__inc_clit ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ವುಗಳ endare__part ;
!%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ದ್ದ r__inda ;!aadarindale
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ದರ ondige ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ದರಲ್ಲ ide__vaux ;
%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ದರ olage ;

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<dist%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%+ಆಗಲೇ%<adv%>:ದಾಗಲೇ # ;

LEXICON 	kinta!kinta
%+ಕ್ಕಿಂತ%<post%>:ಕ್ಕಿಂತ #;
%+ಕ್ಕಿಂತ%<post%>:ಕ್ಕಿಂತ loo;

LEXICON 	ondu
%+ಒಂದು%<post%>:ೊಂದು #;
%+ಒಂದು%<post%>%<loc%>:ೊಂದರಲ್ಲಿ #;

LEXICON NounRoot
ಆತ:ಆತ 		 	ಆತ/__prn;
ಈತ:ಈತ 		 	ಈತ/__prn;	!
ಈಕೆ:ಈಕೆ 			ಈಕೆ/__prn;
ಇವ:ಇವ 		 	ಇವ/__prn;
ತಾ:ತ        	 	ತಾ/__prn;
ಅದು:ಅ 			ಅದು/__prn;
